Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 2. Citations.

Sec. 12.25.175.
Uniform citation format and procedure.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, a citation issued by a peace officer or by another person who is authorized by law to issue a citation in the state must comply with standards concerning uniform citation format and procedure adopted by the Department of Public Safety. The standards must include

a statewide numbering system for citations;

a requirement that a citation be made upon oath or affirmation before a person authorized by law to administer oaths or affirmations or signed with a certification under penalty of perjury that the citation is true and was personally served on the person charged or served in a manner permitted under (d) of this section;

a requirement that the citation contain information required by AS

12.25.200(b)

.

The commissioner of public safety shall provide or prescribe citation forms for use by peace officers and other persons who are authorized by law to issue citations.

The commissioner of public safety shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this section.

The standards adopted by the department under (a) of this section must allow for service of a citation by other than personal service when the citation is for commission of an infraction or a violation for an offense other than an offense under AS

04.16.050

or an offense involving a moving motor vehicle, the offense is punishable by a fine of $500 or less, and the peace officer or other person authorized by law to issue the citation

leaves the citation in a conspicuous place on the vehicle or other personal or real property that was the subject of the infraction or violation; or

serves the citation in a manner permitted for service of process under Rule 4, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2010; am §§ 1, 2 ch 53 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 24, 2014, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “officer or by another person” for “officer and by another person”, in (a)(2), added “or served in a manner permitted under (d) of this section” at the end; added (d).

Effective dates. —

Section 65, ch. 29, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, this section applies “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.25.180.
When peace officer may issue citation or take person before the court.

When a peace officer stops or contacts a person for the commission of a class C felony offense, a misdemeanor, or the violation of a municipal ordinance, the officer may, in the officer’s discretion, issue a citation to the person instead of taking the person before a judge or magistrate under AS

12.25.150

, except the officer may arrest if

the person does not furnish satisfactory evidence of identity;

the peace officer reasonably believes the person is a danger to others;

the crime for which the person is contacted is one involving violence or harm to another person or to property;

the person asks to be taken before a judge or magistrate under AS

12.25.150

; or

the peace officer has probable cause to believe the person committed a crime involving domestic violence; in this paragraph, “crime involving domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

.

When a peace officer stops or contacts a person for the commission of an infraction or a violation, the officer shall issue a citation instead of taking the person before a judge or magistrate under AS

12.25.150

, except the officer may arrest if

the person does not furnish satisfactory evidence of identity;

the person refuses to accept service of the citation.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

A person may not bring a civil action for damages for a failure to comply with the provisions of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1973; am § 19 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 34 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 22 ch 29 SLA 2010; am §§ 51, 52 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(s)(1), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “When a peace officer stops or contacts a person” for “When a person is stopped or contacted by a peace officer”; substituted “the officer may, in the officer’s discretion, issue a citation to the person instead of taking the person before a judge or magistrate under AS

12.25.150

” for “the person may, in the discretion of the contacting peace officer, be issued a citation instead of being taken before a judge or magistrate under AS

12.25.150

”, in (a)(2) substituted “the contacting officer reasonably believes” for “the contacting officer has reasonable and probable cause to believe”; rewrote the introductory language of (b), which read, “When a person is stopped or contacted by a peace officer for the commission of an infraction or a violation, the person shall be issued a citation instead of being taken before a judge or magistrate under AS 12.25.150”, rewrote (b)(2), which read, “the person refuses to accept the citation or to give a written promise to appear as provided for under AS

12.25.190(c)

”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), inserted “a class C felony offense,” following “commission of” and substituted “except the officer may arrest if” for “unless”; in (2), substituted “peace” for “contacting” and deleted “self or” preceding “others”; in (b), substituted “except the officer may arrest if” for “unless”; added (b)(3); added (c); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (b)(3).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 31, SLA 1973 (SB 25), see 1973 Senate Journal Supplement No. 7, p. 2.

Sec. 12.25.190.
When person to be given five-day notice to appear in court.

When a person is contacted by a peace officer and the peace officer exercises one of the options provided for in AS

12.25.180

, the officer shall prepare a written citation and issue it to the person.

The time specified in the notice to appear shall be at least two working days after the issuance of the citation under AS

12.25.180(a)

.

The person cited shall accept at least one copy of the written citation prepared by the peace officer.

The time specified in the notice to appear shall be at least five working days after issuance of the citation under AS

12.25.180(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1973; am § 20 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 20 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 12 ch 34 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 81 SLA 1989; am § 25 ch 28 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 64 SLA 2004; am § 23 ch 29 SLA 2010; am §§ 53, 54 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Delayed amendment of subsection (c). —

Under §§ 26 and 30,
ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by § 3,
ch. 34, SLA 2004, § 41,
ch. 12, SLA 2006, § 1,
ch. 19, SLA 2009, § 24,
ch. 29, SLA 2010, § 1,
ch. 47, SLA 2010, and § 3,
ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in § 30(2),
ch. 28, SLA 2000, subsection (c) of this section will be repealed and reenacted.
The contingency described in § 30(2),
ch. 28, SLA 2000, gives effect to the change “90 days after the date the chair of the Alaska Legislative Council notifies the revisor of statutes that in the previous state fiscal year the state did not receive and does not anticipate receiving federal funding for a statewide boating and safety education program; the director of the division of legislative finance shall notify the chair of the Alaska Legislative Council when the state, in the previous fiscal year, did not receive federal funding for a statewide boating and safety program; the chair of the Alaska Legislative Council may not give the notice described in this section unless the notice is approved by a vote of a majority of the members of the Alaska Legislative Council.” Thereafter, subsection (c) will read as follows: “(c) The person cited shall accept at least one copy of the written citation prepared by the peace officer.” As of May 2022, the contingency had not occurred.

Under sec. 1(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000, any other intervening amendments to subsection (c) are not to be retained when that subsection is amended under sec. 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, in (c) of this section, “AS

05.25.090(c)

” was substituted for “AS

05.25.090(b)

” to correct a manifest error.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(s)(2), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “one of the options provided” for “the option provided”; in (b), substituted “five working days after the issuance of the citation” for “five days after the alleged violation or the issuance of the citation, whichever is later, unless the person cited requests an earlier hearing”; rewrote (c); conditionally rewrote (c), as repealed and reenacted by sec. 26, ch. 28, SLA 2000 and by sec. 41, ch. 12, SLA 2006.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “two” for “five” and inserted “under AS

12.25.180(a)

” at the end of the sentence; added (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of this section applies “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.25.195.
Disposition of scheduled offenses.

If a person cited for an offense for which a scheduled amount of bail or a fine has been established does not contest the citation, the person may mail or personally deliver to the clerk of the court with appropriate jurisdiction if a bailable offense, or to the clerk of the municipality that issued the citation if a scheduled municipal fine, the amount of the bail or fine indicated on the citation for the offense together with a copy of the citation signed by the person indicating the person’s waiver of court appearance, entry of plea of no contest, and forfeiture of bail or fine. The citation with the bail or fine shall be mailed or personally delivered on or before the 30th day after the date the citation was issued.

When bail or a fine is forfeited under this section, a judgment of conviction shall be entered. The bail or fine paid is complete satisfaction for the offense.

Disposition of an offense under (a) of this section may not occur unless the person cited for the offense pays the surcharge prescribed in AS

12.55.039

in addition to the scheduled bail or fine amount. The surcharge required to be paid under this subsection shall be deposited into the general fund and accounted for under AS

37.05.142

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 76 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1998; am § 25 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “If a” for “A”, added “does not contest the citation, the person”, and substituted the last sentence for the last two sentences.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.25.200.
Form for citations.

The chief administrative officer of each law enforcement agency or other agency authorized to issue citations in the state is responsible for the issuance of books containing appropriate citations, and shall maintain a record of each book and each citation contained in it and shall require and retain a receipt for every book issued to a peace officer or other person authorized to issue citations.

A citation issued under AS

12.25.180

or other law authorizing the issuance of a citation must be in writing and indicate, if applicable,

the amount of bail or fine and the surcharge applicable to the offense;

the procedure a person must follow in responding to the citation;

that, if the person fails to pay the bail or fine, the person must appear in court;

that failure to pay the bail or fine or appear in court for an offense involving a moving motor vehicle may result in

suspension of the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license; or

attachment of the person’s permanent fund dividend to pay the fine plus court and collection costs under AS

28.05.155

; and

that the person has a right to

a trial;

engage counsel;

confront and question witnesses;

testify;

subpoena witnesses on the person’s behalf.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1973; am § 3 ch 76 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 1998; am § 26 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), added “or other agency authorized to issue citations” following “law enforcement agency”, and “or other person authorized to issue citations” following “for every book issued to a peace officer”; rewrote the introductory language of (b), which read, “A citation issued under AS

12.25.180

must indicate”, and made stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of this section applies “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.25.210.
Disposition and records of citations.

A peace officer or other person authorized by law to issue a citation, upon issuing a citation to an alleged violator under AS

12.25.180

or other law, on or before the 10th working day after issuance, shall deposit the original or a copy of the citation with a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense. If the citation charges an offense under a municipal ordinance for which a scheduled fine has been established, the peace officer shall deposit the original or a copy of the citation with the clerk of the municipality that issued the citation, unless otherwise provided under rule adopted by the supreme court. Failure to file the citation within the prescribed time is not a basis for dismissal of the citation.

Upon the deposit of the original or a copy of the citation with a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense, the original or copy of the citation may be disposed of only by trial in the court or other official action by a magistrate or judge of the court.

It is unlawful and official misconduct for a peace officer or other officer or public employee to dispose of a citation or copies of it or of the record of the issuance of the citation in a manner other than as required in this section.

The chief administrative officer of each law enforcement or other agency shall require each officer or other person in the agency to retain a copy of every citation issued by the officer or other person to an alleged violator of a law or ordinance and all copies of every citation that has been spoiled or upon which any entry has been made and not issued to an alleged violator.

The chief administrative officer of each law enforcement or other agency shall also maintain, in connection with every citation issued by an officer or other person in the agency, a record of the disposition of the charge by the court in which the original or copy of the citation was deposited.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1973; am § 4 ch 76 SLA 1987; am §§ 27 — 29 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), in the first sentence, added “or other person authorized by law to issue a citation” following “A peace officer”, and “or other law, on or before the 10th working day after issuance” following “AS

12.25.180

”, and added the last sentence; in (d), added “or other” following “each law enforcement”, added “or other person” two times, and substituted “retain” for “return” following “in the agency to”; in (e), added “or other” following “each law enforcement”, “or other person” following “issued by an officer”, and made stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61,
ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a), (d), and (e) of this section apply “to all citations issued
—. for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.25.220.
When copy of citation considered a lawful complaint.

If the form of citation provided under AS

12.25.200

includes information and is sworn to as required under the laws of this state in respect to a complaint charging commission of the offense alleged in the citation, then the citation when filed with a court having jurisdiction is considered to be a lawful complaint for the purpose of prosecution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1973)

Sec. 12.25.230.
Failure to obey citation; limitation on penalty.

Except as provided in (b) of this section or otherwise specifically provided by law, a person who fails to appear in court to answer the citation, regardless of the disposition of the charge for which the citation was issued, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person who fails to pay the bail or fine or appear in court in response to a citation for which a scheduled bail or fine is established, regardless of the disposition of the charge for which the citation was issued, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

If a person cited for an offense for which an amount of scheduled bail or fine has been established appears in court and is found guilty, the penalty imposed for the offense may not exceed the bail or fine established for the offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1973; am § 5 ch 144 SLA 1977; am §§ 5, 6 ch 76 SLA 1987; am §§ 30, 31 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), added “or otherwise specifically provided by law” following “in (b) of this section”, and substituted “guilty of a class A misdemeanor” for “guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.”; repealed and reenacted (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a) and (b) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”